Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2004
Community college gap assistance; application.

Application for community college gap assistance under the community college gap assistance program shall be made to the community college or other eligible institution in which the applicant is enrolled or intends to enroll. An application shall be valid for six months from the date of signature on the application. The applicant shall provide documentation of all sources of income. An applicant shall not receive community college gap assistance for more than one eligible program.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 30;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 59.